smi/src/fst/stems/arabic_roman_digits.lexc
LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN  ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE  ;

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    X+Use/Circ:X    2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XX+Use/Circ:XX   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  XXX+Use/Circ:XXX  2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XL+Use/Circ:XL   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
    L+Use/Circ:L    2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   LX+Use/Circ:LX   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  LXX+Use/Circ:LXX  2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XC+Use/Circ:XC   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE  ;

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    I:I    2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II:II   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III:III  2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV:IV   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V:V    2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI:VI   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII:VII  2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX:IX   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;




! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !

LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ some isolated numeral expressions
           ½:½   NUMTAG ;
           ¹:¹   NUMTAG ;
           ²:²   NUMTAG ;
           ³:³   NUMTAG ;
           ¼:¼   NUMTAG ;
           ¾:¾   NUMTAG ;
